Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CHILDREN’S ADVOCACY CENTER FUND
SECTION 1. Section 2 of  this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 418.746 to
418.796.
SECTION 2. (1) The Children’s Advocacy Center Fund is established in the State  Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Children’s Advo-
cacy Center Fund shall be credited to the fund. The fund consists of moneys appropriated,
allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly  or otherwise and
interest earned on moneys in the fund. The moneys in the  fund are continuously appropri-
ated to the Department of Justice for carrying out the purposes of ORS 418.786.
(2) To establish and maintain sufficient children’s advocacy centers and regional
children’s advocacy centers  in Oregon necessary to ensure that every child referred to a
center for concerns of  neglect or abuse receives a skilled, complete and, if needed,
forensically sound child abuse assessment, the Legislative Assembly  shall appropriate, allo-
cate or otherwise make available to the Children’s Advocacy Center  Fund moneys necessary
to fully fund the grant program required by ORS 418.786.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 418.788 is amended to read:
418.788. (1) Subject to the availability of funds under the provisions of ORS 418.796  and section
2 of this 2024 Act , the administrator of the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention  Program
shall make grants for the establishment and maintenance  of children’s advocacy centers or regional
children’s advocacy centers.
(2)(a) A public or private agency may apply to the administrator for a grant to:
(A) Establish and maintain a children’s advocacy center or regional  children’s advocacy center;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1579 (SB 1579-B) Page 1
(B) Provide training and  technical assistance to children’s advocacy centers or county child
abuse multidisciplinary teams; or
(C) Provide coordination and support to regional children’s advocacy centers.
(b) The administrator may consolidate applications from more than one public or private  agency
or may return the application with the recommendation that the application be consolidated.
(3) The administrator shall by rule establish criteria for awarding grants  to establish and
maintain children’s advocacy centers or regional  children’s advocacy centers, including but not
limited to:
(a) Expenses eligible for reimbursement from funds under ORS  418.796 and section 2 of this
2024 Act;
(b) The extent to which the applicant’s proposal  will best accomplish the purposes of ORS
418.746 to 418.796;
(c) The extent to which an applicant meets criteria for receiving a grant to:
(A) Establish and maintain a children’s advocacy center or regional  children’s advocacy center;
(B) Provide training and technical assistance to  children’s advocacy centers and county child
abuse multidisciplinary teams; or
(C) Provide coordination and support to regional children’s advocacy centers;
(d) Minimum facility standards for  children’s advocacy centers and regional children’s advocacy
centers consistent with national accreditation standards to  ensure that children receive consistent,
evidence-based intervention services statewide;
(e) Minimum  forensic interview training standards that are consistent with national forensic
interview training standards, evidence-based and supported by current forensic  interview research;
and
(f) For a regional children’s advocacy center, the extent to which the applicant’s proposal  meets
the documented needs of the communities, children’s  advocacy centers and county child abuse
multidisciplinary teams in the region or regions to be served by the center.
(4) The administrator is  not required to fund any grant in the total amount requested in the
application.
CHILDREN’S ADVOCACY CENTER ONE-TIME GRANTS
SECTION 4.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Children’s advocacy center” means a facility that meets the facility standards de-
scribed in ORS 418.788, to which a child from the community may be referred to receive a
thorough child abuse assessment, as defined in ORS 418.782, for the purpose  of determining
whether the  child has been abused or neglected, and that facilitates a coordinated, compre-
hensive and multidisciplinary response to cases of child abuse.
(b) “Regional children’s advocacy center” means a facility operated by a children’s  ad-
vocacy center that meets the facility standards described in  ORS 418.788 and is selected by
the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program  to provide training and complex case
assistance, including one or more of the following:
(A) Consultation;
(B) Education;
(C) Referral;
(D) Technical assistance; and
(E) If authorized by the Department of Justice, other services as needed.
(2) The  Department of Justice shall develop and administer a one-time noncompetitive
grant program to expand  access to services and supports provided by children’s advocacy
centers and  regional children’s advocacy centers and to increase the number of children
served by children’s advocacy centers and regional children’s advocacy centers  in this state.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1579 (SB 1579-B) Page 2
(3)(a) The department shall distribute 50 percent of the amounts available for the grant
program, in equal shares to each children’s advocacy center that  is providing services in this
state on the effective date of this 2024 Act.
(b) If the department  is unable to distribute one or more children’s advocacy center
share or portion of a share under this subsection and amounts remain  undistributed on June
30, 2025, the department shall distribute the undistributed amounts to  Oregon Child Abuse
Solutions for the purpose of providing or coordinating the provision of assistance  to
children’s advocacy centers seeking accreditation with the National Children’s Alliance.
(4) The department shall distribute the remaining 50  percent of amounts available for the
grant program as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(5) The department shall adopt rules for distributing the remaining 50  percent of
amounts available for the grant program. The rules must, at a minimum:
(a) Require that an  applicant certify that on or before June 30, 2025, the applicant will
be accredited by the National Children’s Alliance or will have  an application for accreditation
with the National Children’s Alliance pending.
(b) Require children’s advocacy centers to apply directly for the grants.
(c) Allow a health care provider or a medical facility to apply for a grant to expand
medical assessment services, intervention services and any other services and supports  not
inconsistent with the purposes of ORS 418.746 to 418.796, if:
(A) The health care provider or medical facility is connected through  a linkage agree-
ment or contract with a children’s advocacy center; and
(B) The children’s advocacy center satisfies the accreditation requirements described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(d) Permit the department, when determining the amounts of grants  awarded under this
subsection, to consider:
(A) The applicant’s capability to expand access to or maintain a children’s  advocacy
center in an underserved community;
(B) The applicant’s capability to expand access of a children’s advocacy center to  a ge-
ographic area of this state with no children’s advocacy centers;
(C) The likelihood that the applicant, if awarded a  grant, will expand access to children’s
advocacy center services and supports to children from historically marginalized and  under-
served communities;
(D) If awarded a grant, the ability of the existing  or proposed children’s advocacy center
to provide behavioral and mental health services for victims of child abuse;
(E) The applicant’s capability to provide services to drug endangered children; and
(F) The applicant’s capability to provide services to children who have been trafficked.
(e) Allow grant recipients to use the grants:
(A) To expand access to designated medical professionals, as  described in ORS 418.747 (9);
and
(B) For costs associated with obtaining accreditation from the National Children’s  Alli-
ance, including application fees and support staff expenses.
(f) Require applicants to demonstrate how the grant award  would allow for initial con-
sultation with a designated medical professional,  as defined in ORS 419B.023, within 48 hours
in accordance with Karly’s Law and would improve response times for intervention following
incidents of child abuse and the prevention of child fatalities.
(g) Provide that the total amount distributed to a given children’s advocacy center  under
this section may not exceed $300,000, calculated based on the total of:
(A) Amounts distributed to the children’s advocacy center under subsection  (3) of this
section; and
(B) Amounts awarded to the children’s advocacy  center under this subsection, including
the amounts of any grants awarded as permitted under paragraph (c)  of this subsection to
Enrolled Senate Bill 1579 (SB 1579-B) Page 3
a health care provider or medical facility that is connected with the children’s advocacy
center.
(6) The department shall award and distribute all of the amounts available for  grants
under this section no later than June 30, 2025.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Children’s Advocacy Center One-Time Grant  Fund is established in
the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General  Fund. The Children’s Advocacy
Center One-Time Grant Fund consists of moneys appropriated, allocated,  deposited or
transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise. Interest earned by the
fund shall be credited to  the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the
Department of Justice for carrying out the purposes of section 4 of this 2024 Act.
(2) The department may use moneys in the fund to pay the administrative costs  associ-
ated with the fund and  with administering the grant program under section 4 of this 2024
Act.
APPROPRIATION
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Department of  Justice, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the General
Fund, the amount of  $7,000,000, for deposit in the Children’s Advocacy Center One-Time
Grant Fund established under section 5 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$7,000,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and other federal funds,  collected or received by the Department
of Justice, for the Crime Victim and Survivor Services  Division, for the Children’s Advocacy
Center One-Time Grant Fund established by section 5 of this  2024 Act, for the grants and
grant program administrative costs under section 4 of this 2024 Act.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 8. Sections 4 and 5 of this 2024 Act are repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 9. The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any  leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 10. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1579 (SB 1579-B) Page 4
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1579 (SB 1579-B) Page 5